District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-345.01

Cashing government checks of District residents required.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-40, § 2(c), 28 DCR 3395
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(a), 44 DCR 6933

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-345.1.

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.